Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Voting

§§ 17-20-720 and 17-20-721.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-722.
Quorum requirements.

Except for member votes on mergers, consolidations, sale or disposition of assets, and dissolutions, ten percent (10%) of all members of the cooperative utility present in person or by proxy or one hundred (100) members present in person, whichever is fewer, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members. If less than a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of those present in person shall adjourn the meeting, but may reschedule the meeting with further notice.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§§ 17-20-723 through 17-20-727.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-20-728.
Election of directors.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which a cooperative utility supplies service to its members shall be divided into two (2) or more director districts, and in respect to each such director district shall describe the boundaries thereof and designate the number of directors that shall be elected by the members residing therein.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-20-729.
Amendment of bylaws.

Notwithstanding W.S. 17-19-1021(a)(i) and (ii), a cooperative utility may amend its bylaws not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of directors after notice as required by this section.

A cooperative utility shall provide notice of any meeting of the board of directors at which an amendment proposed under subsection (a) of this section is to be voted upon at least thirty (30) days before the meeting. The notice shall:

State that a purpose of the meeting is to consider a proposed amendment to the bylaws;

Contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment;

Be fair and reasonable. Fair and reasonable notice includes, but is not limited to, advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation within the cooperative utility’s service area and direct mailings to members such as in a bill or other communication.

History.

2019 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

Articles 8 through 10. [Reserved]